Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201872-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 72-2301 to 72-2310 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act.

Laws 2005, LB 217, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1000, § 3.
April 18, 2018